Vermont, session 2025-2026, H356.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. UNEMPLOYMENT COMPENSATION BENEFIT
MODERNIZATION ADVISORY COMMITTEE; REPORT
VT LEG #380837 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.356
2025 Page 2 of 5
(a) Creation. There is created the Unemployment Compensation Benefit
Modernization Advisory Committee to advise the Department of Labor on the
implementation and deployment of technological upgrades to the delivery
system for unemployment compensation benefits.
(b) Membership. The Committee shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) two current members of the House of Representatives, not all from
the same political party, appointed by the Speaker of the House, of whom one
shall be a member of the Joint Information Technology Oversight Committee
and one shall be a member of the House Committee on Commerce and
Economic Development;
(2) two current members of the Senate, not all from the same political
party, appointed by the Committee on Committees, of whom one shall be a
member of the Joint Information Technology Oversight Committee and one
shall be a member of the Senate Committee on Economic Development,
Housing and General Affairs;
(3) three employees of the Department of Labor who will regularly use
the technological upgrades, who shall be appointed by the Commissioner of
Labor;
(4) one employee from the Agency of Digital Services, who shall be
appointed by the Secretary of Digital Services;
VT LEG #380837 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.356
2025 Page 3 of 5
(5) one representative of organized labor associated with the
construction trades, who shall be nominated by a State labor federation and
appointed by the Governor;
(6) one representative of a group representing employers, who shall be
appointed by the Governor; and
(7) one attorney experienced in representing unemployment insurance
claimants, who shall be appointed by the Director of Vermont Legal Aid.
(c) Powers and duties. The Committee shall study the technological
upgrades to the delivery system for unemployment compensation benefits and
shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) to monitor the implementation and deployment of the upgrades;
(2) to be able to request information related to the upgrades at any time;
(3) to make recommendations to the Department of Labor at any time;
and
(4) to provide assistance on testing the upgrades.
(d) Assistance. The Committee shall have the administrative and technical
assistance of the Department of Labor, including for the purpose of scheduling
meetings.
(e) Report. The Committee shall submit a written report to the Joint
Information Technology Oversight Committee, the House Committee on
Commerce and Economic Development, and the Senate Committee on
VT LEG #380837 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.356
2025 Page 4 of 5
Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs on a quarterly basis,
with the first report due on or before September 30, 2025. The report shall
include the Committee’s assessment of the progress regarding implementation
and testing of the technological upgrades, a list of recommendations that the
Committee has made to the Department of Labor, and whether the Department
of Labor has accepted those recommendations. The Committee shall provide
the Department of Labor with a draft copy of the report at least 30 days prior to
its submission, and the Department of Labor shall be permitted to have its
response included in the quarterly report.
(f) Meetings.
(1) The Commissioner of Labor, or the Commissioner’s designee, shall
call the first meeting of the Committee to occur on or before May 1, 2025.
(2) The Committee shall meet at least once every two months.
(3) The Committee shall select a chair from among its members at the
first meeting.
(4) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(5) The Committee shall cease to exist on June 30, 2026 or whenever
the Committee determines by a two-thirds vote that the technological upgrades
have been successfully implemented, whichever is later.
(g) Compensation and reimbursement.
VT LEG #380837 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.356
2025 Page 5 of 5
(1) For attendance at meetings during adjournment of the General
Assembly, a legislative member of the Committee shall be entitled to per diem
compensation and reimbursement of expenses pursuant to 2 V.S.A. § 23 for
not more than eight meetings.
(2) Other members of the Committee who are not employed by the
Department of Labor or the Agency of Digital Services shall be entitled to per
diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses as permitted under
32 V.S.A. § 1010 for not more than eight meetings.
(3) These payments shall be made from monies appropriated to the
General Assembly.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380837 v.1